Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,147
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) Pediatric cancer is the number one cause of death due to disease in the United States for children from birth to fourteen years of age;

(2) Nebraska ranks fifth in the United States in incidence of pediatric cancer;

(3) Eighty percent of children with the most common types of pediatric cancer will survive but the majority of pediatric cancer survivors will have chronic medical conditions for the rest of their lives; and

(4) Pediatric cancer survivors returning to school after successful treatment have specific cognitive, behavioral, physical, developmental, and social impairments that must be accommodated in order for the survivors to achieve their full educational potential.

Laws 2015, LB511, § 1.